When looking up, do not stare so blindly
This document is ment for my writing, this website is ment for that as well. My intersting type I will show a new world. When looking into it my ideas are not so far off from wht others might think. What will i do if you come to realize taht i am not the only one.

Things for this Document
ideas and Concepts
Short Stories
Company Ideas or Interesting Topics
Today while listneing to swimming with dolphins I came upon the idea of a mnaga that would targeted older people. it seems that characters in manga are high schoolers and they are young(16 to 17) or even younger. It would be nice to have a story that takes place with older characters such as 20 and above. I dont hink anyone looks at chracters and says wow hes so young. They look like they are older anyway, why not make them really taht age? There is no distinction from 15 to 25 in anime/manga. Anyway. The idea stems around the world of an office love. A man has always had a cursh on this girl in his office

The story would be almost a slice of life type deal with him going through the everyday life kinda dael. Facing his fears and nervousness and admiring from afar. Dealign with coworkers and the pressures of everyday life while secretly admiring his goal

to me thinking about the average thigns, there is nothign realyl average about the lives that we live. As long as our bodies breath and our hearts beat, we are always living extradnary lives.Because the universe has brought us in to excistence, something that might of been wrong in the first place. Something that was not supposed to happen. Born from the stars.

now i say that our excistence is pretty fragile, and maybe not even that big. When you fight your whole life and realize you have conquered a fraction of light, a pale blue dot in the vast universe. Is it still an accomplishment? of course a big one , but in the size of time and space, it is extremely small. My plan to conquer the earth stopped when this thought hit me, and really hit me. I would like to rule the universe, not just earth. An impossibility at this current time. In the future who knows. It is unwritten like the endless days of the universe.A stone slab that is in a vacumm never feeling the rain nor wind.'
To take in effect of the weirdness of this situation I emplor you undertand

I ask my self"am i good a writer?" and the words taht come back to me is, well not really, you havent reeally written anything in 10 years, your washed up , your ideas are theo nly thing that is left for you. Your abilities stopped when you stopped writing and told everyone that you wrote thigns, that you wrote uhundreds of stories. Only in your mind you should of said. But no, keep passing your seld off as a writer. You dont even read, how can you write ? my ideas are sound and well thought out, the details are crips and fresh. I have never wrote astory for a more thant a few pages. This is my weaknses. My stories are short only lines. The idea is there but here is no spark or follow up with more ideas that grow onto each other and breath life into them. If you are goign to write something, put your all in it for 3 months and then eafter that start on soemthing else , beacuase the thoughts will be dead in your mind , not as new and exceiting , other things will creep up and invade your dreams. Let them infect you for 3 months then banish them to the back to grow and come back another time.

First: What do i want to write about now, what story do i want to pursue. Should i puick up an old story and run with it for a couple of months? Like the wizard story.
I have many ideas and many places. Pick on that excites you and then rock its world
We have a couple of thigns we can write about
The wizard story about the daughter with no abilities
the necromancer story

the battle angels story

nuero sparks the demon writer

the soul sell story(boy bargins souls. Steals and buys them)

The slice of life tokyo love

Could go back to Ecco Island? Amy and the newearl family and Jon? Hey they have a lot of great tales to tell

the phantasy star universe has led me to create some cool things

Story after the dreams with sir and the nurse

morrowind stories with geosphere and that whole hting ( i could even re write the old storiesa bout raven

stories of Jerico and the demon planes

The stories of nefarious and his conqering and fall

the psycho and cop
The Prince

Talking about the different fesitval towns

Even a story about sleep hollow

There is timberlimber and the half split world where the masters of the universre tourny is held

I should do my seasonal fictions again. Winter time, a winter story. halloween time a halloween story. Then the rest of the year....... just super lame i guess hahaha Its like Halloween , thanksgiving, and christmas then the year starts again , and its all buildign up to those three holidays for me. Also my birthday is the month before so it all falls kind of in a row of things.

Something taht you do not always see is taht something is right infront of your eyes. It looks like somethign shoyld be right, but at the same time, everything seems to be wrong. Twisted in a sort of reality taht doesnt seem that it could be real. An imaginary trinket of sorts danglign from your neck, tying you down this freakish nightmare. Do not give in, while the pressure sits there it does not mean that we will give up and rest while everythign things seems to be messed up , quite the opposite. We will act and make everythign right form the beginning of time. Letting the universse know that we will not subside to its commands any more ,to forge our own truth out of the air. Let me tell the world what i mean for right now , what will become of everything to this day. Nothign will let me follow my own destiney if I my self do no pursue it.

What are things that you would like to learn?

Japanese
Korean
Chinese
HTML and CSS
PHP
Make Money
Running a internet Busienss or how to sell
Draw amy newearl
Host a esports tournament
Head a gaming community
Game Programming
How to teach people
How to negotiate
How to read people
How to control emotions
Tai chi
Speed read
Lead
Chinese
Be the best league of legends player in the world.
How to travel efficiently
>The goal, looking at the time i have left. The end of the season is goign to be around mid november or beginning of november. This means that by the end of september i need to be almost to diamond. I need to be at least plat 1 and trying to get into diamond. October will be the climb from diamond to challanger. I will play zyra the most , but i might want to pick up a second champ, maye thresh or nami. They are both realyl good and i doubt they will be both banned at the same time. Zyra will not be banned unles peopel know they are palying with me and deide to eliminate her from the selection. Such as im playing alot and high enough that im only playing with the same people over and over again. When i reach a certain level i will learn more champions to the degree that i know zyra, i think this is a way to become the best. Spam chapmionsa nd learn their every strength and make their weakness shrink from your skill. Thinking of it, when faker plays a certain champ, would he play him if he did not practice to the point of mastery? No i dont think so. I thnk people also do not knwo when to swtich or pick up another champs. it takes alot of time to master a champion, but you start small and you always learn as you are playing. Even when you mster a champ, you still learn more from playing them. But to play a champ better then anyone and also to be able to maake that champ work when others cant is mastery. You will win your matches,beacuse you have mastery and they do not. Or most will not. When picking up a new champ , you will prob lose right awawy, but it will soon balance out. And you will hit the platform and keep going.
In the other types of roles, the msatery of a champion also involces complex combos with summoners and other characters. Farmign is also a skill that should be acquried when mastering this champ. If you canntot farm expertly with them, then you do not have mastery. I now see that alot of the things of the game, such as vision and last hitting depend on mastery of the champ and not so much the art. You can be good at last hitting to a basic sense which you shoyld, but to make the most optimaal farm you need to use abilites (in the beginngning) and that depends on the champion. Also their base dmg will vary leading to miss htis in the beginnnign with out the mstery of the champ . move ment is very important too. Such as playing nid/gragas support. You can ward the whole map in about 40 seconds by going through walls. This is something only performed by mastery of a champ.

The Key to gettign better is mastering a champ and learning the basics of the game. Gain the basic understanding of the game and start mastering champs one by one. I think this is the way to become the best. When meta comes around, you can then pick up that champ and master it beacuse you know the process and what to look for. If you know the rules of engagment then you know what you should be doing. you can then learn the champion ad keep your cgame knowledge intact. Expanding it now through a different lense. When i reach the top I will publish a guide like this. That will give a pathway to the top. I believe you should learn/master 2 champs per role to perform well in solo que. What happens is many players only play one champ and never play another. They have good mechanics , so they can perform well on other champs, but they will not have the same results as they do with their main champ that they play. Mastery of a champ will depend on how the person plays , hwo they practice , how much they play and the quality of their play. If they keep thiniking and expiramenting with them, then they will progress, if htey stop thinking and they will surely not move

When playing, i feel sort of like i am not going anywher sometimes, or at least i did for a while. my recent stunt with zyra has turned something to me. Like befoer if i lost with a champ i would maybe paly one mroe and if i won or lose would meanthat they are on a good list. But when i start just playing zyra, like 30 games in a couple of games of just her. I noticed that if i kept with her i should learn how to do certtain things and react to certain situations. i knew taht i liked her and she could be played support. she has a good ult and a root. I could do the same thing with like karma, her cc is a little different but knowing how to play her well , i bet i could dominate very easily. Her q for disengeage , sheild plus w for engaeg. This like these will come with masatery of a champ. with zyra, i look at at the peopel who play her the most, looked at their items , what htey leveled up first and thought why? Why choose q over e? the e root is longer as it levels up and it does around the same dmg as q. But what i noticed is that the dmg and cooldown go down on q. making it able tocast alot more meaning that you can summon plants faster and harras more. The root on her w does not get any cooldown reduction with lvl up. Item wise, frost fang is clutch. It allows her to get off her ult on multiple targets. I need to learn the range on it though. But with the synergy with frost and her ult, zyra becomes a great reengage or even engage if pulled off right. She cannot straight up engaeg like a leona or malph, bush or side, she will do well. The reengage is the best. beacasu the enemy team will be diving all in, meaning they will be grouped. then its time to strike.
Liandys is also very good. With the root and slows this procts the dmg to double on the life per second. It is also proct y her plants, so it is constatnt dmg. The same can be said with morellonomicon. I will need to look for other items that will syn with her. So far its been liandyrs, morello, maybe zohnyas depending on their team, a chalice for mana and sell at end, and frost fang.

boots , sightstone and frost take up three slots. So i only have three other slots of items. And since morello has deep wound and liandyrs has dmg max heaht those items are almost a must get in thsi meta. the late game meta that is. Depending on how i am doing in lan will depend on what items to build first and if i should even buy somthing else. Like going for aan early zhons for the massive dmg spike and the protection. Again i will need to explore other items. Also morrelo gives you 80 which is amazing for what it gives you.

When studying pro players it is alwyas good to ask why. why do they play the way they do , why do they build the way they do and a just keep asking why. Why doesnt faker die ? analyze find the answer , adaption and incorporate it into your style. Take everythign that is good from pro players , discard the bad, discard your egeo and gain humbleness. Improve every mouse click everythign that you are doing learn how to do better. Learn from other people , they might not be that good , but are they good at something? is there anythign you can leanr from them ? if there is learn it. and discard the rest
To climb the ladders, if i can start wining multiple games in a row and increse my win ratio, then i can climb extremely fasat. Such as getting into plat and maybe skipping tier 5 or 4

#September 4th

Now i have gotten to gold 2 on september 4th. I will try to become plat, this week end. I will have to win at least 10 games , then another 5 to get into plat. and that is with out any losses. Can i do it? yes i can. Once i establish better zyra play then i will dominate even more and carry even harder, i will try to roam and effect thegame even harder, invading their jungle , ganking mid, roaming everywhere and winning harder then i am now. I will try to win ebfeor the 30 min mark, no more late gaames, just pushing and ending so hard that nothing will stop me and my team. That is how i will play. I will make the game run smoothly for everyone crippling the enemies defense and offense in any way i can. The problem is that zyra is a very slow champion , her move speed is extremely poor. I can get vision though with seeds that last for 30 seconds. So it really means i sacrifice dmg for sight when i use them. i can have 2 down then ti will take another 20 seco to have two up again , so i have about 10 seconds of sight with dmg. this isnt like a nid thta can jump over the wll as and leave her traps everywhere. Which those last a very long time.

when i think of the time i spent playing before picking somethign and sticking with it, i noticed i would alays try to adapt to situatoin, but i was not good with it because that situation aws unfamiliar to me. the champ the items , the how do i play agaisnt was new, this tiem thought it was not so much, i gain the advantage,beacuse i know what to do. The match ups will become easier , and in team fights i will know what to do. I made some clutch plays, when peopla re grouped up. I still need to go over items and see if they might be better. Like i stated before the items taht i choose now are almost core for the moment, but that last item might be debatble. and the order can change as well.

I have had very unsuccesful days in league at the moment, i was about to get a step closer to my goal then i actually fell quitw a bit. It seems taht playing alot of games in a day might not be the best practice, at the same time it made me realize something, because in the last two days of playing i have lost more than i have won. I noticed that i was not focusing on my self, in game i think i am not on tilit , but in reality , i am. I am no longer thinking " what is the best thign i can do right now, what is going on this instant, taht i can take advantage of ? What can i do to win? it has been , wow these peopla re losing , or how come they do not want to win. Even in team fights its more of me just pressing buttons and hoping something happens, its never calculated nor is it thought out, during the fight i dont say how can i best thsi situation , how can i move, attack to make us win this fight, who cn i get to dmg with out dying , can i make a risk and live? it is alwya waiting and hoping that it goes right.And if i fail I looked at my own misatkes , but i put more blame on my team. In the right sense i should just forget about my team and look at my individual play. How well did i do? did i perform well or did i feed or die alot? did i use abilites correctly, did i buy the right items, what could i have done to turn the game around or eeven win harder. Thsees are the things i should be focusing on, not how bad my team is or how they should build or play. Its all about me, me getting better, looking at my mistakes and fixing them. fixing my playstyle , imporiving even when losing games. Taking advantage and punishing when others make mistakes on the field. That is what i should be doing

I have noticed that i am not good enought to completly stomp and carry games at low elo. I will be, I can win my lane extremely well and as i improve on my decision making and things, also my champion mastery, especially the carrying champs that do dmg and can make super clutch plays or even snowball completely out of control(kat, riven, graves, fiora) playing a ton of games and just losing them doesnt do much for me ,especiially when i am not concentrating on my self and focusing on team mistakes. I noticed that yesterday i played a game with alistar and our team was losing quite badly. I took stock of my own actions and noticed alot of mistakes and things that could of been improved. Mid game i was okay, but when it came to team fights i was a little lost, since we were losing. This brings up a valuble lesson, to leanr to play champs when behind and or go for strats that can get you back in the game. For example , that game there was no way to win a team fight, we should of grouped and picked off people or bush ganked. Farm up some more and try to equal the gold towhere we can fight them.

Team fighting is somethign that shoyld be done if you have the right dmg and team comp for it. people need tounderstand how to apprach and where to be positioned. I often see people with alot of wins a in a row, but their gameplay still is lacking. Or they make critical mistakes. It leads me to believe that anotehr person on their team carried them or the team they werw facing was not the best. That could be the same for me as well. I am still dying more in the late game. But i am seeing that and i see why I am dying, its like an adc that stands in the front lines. I do not need to be in the middle of the team to do dmg, if i stay behind and outo f harms way, when they dive i can stay alive. Now this does not mean hide behind them forever. you need to know when to be aggressive and how to evade attacks and dodge. To get to crucial targets you will need to get out in front.If you have an escape it would be ok to be out in front as well. For zyra she is a plant stuckin the ground. she has very little chance of getting out of something if her flash is down. she can kite a little with her plants and slow, but if they use any kind of mobility to get close after that, its pretty much a free kill unless she has health to sustain and cd to keep casting to try and get away. Again not that likely.

Another bad night last night. I think it all started with my first team surrenduering a winnable game. Then it was kind of a string of bad luck.I really just need to ignore team mates. They say dumb things and they do not want to win. Focusing on them makes me forget about awhat i am doing, makes me forget about me. I dont look and think about the game, i think and look at them. I can be mindful of them, but i should not focus on them. This weekend I will commit to focusing on my self. I have friday all the way to sunday. 3 days. If i focus on my own gameplay and correct my mistakes , i believe i can get to plat this weekened. Maybe even more. I never noticed till now. That all the time i have played sports and anythign else. I have focused on the other person or other people. In tennis it was always how can they beat me , why am i so bad, how can they alwyas play better then me. I never looked at each point or each game and said, ok what did i do right, what did i do wrong. Even playing cs back in theday. Why is my team so abd, why cant they just kill one person. Again, why did I die? well i was out of position and they had two people. the angle i approached opened me to the other person. So i killed one but the other person got me.
Even in life, it can be applied. What did i do wrong, what did i do right and get better at those things. Really any skill can be improved if you focus on your self. Admit that you are not the best and look at your mistakes and improve everything you can in the shortest amount of time. Like earlier i said i was getting better just by mastering one champion. While it is true that i feel extremely confident on zyra, it doesnt really mean that i am getting that much better at the game..Only taht champion am i good at. I still do believe that masterying a champ is an excellent way to get better at the game and get your champ pool to a good size. Spamming a champ is the same, but it doesnt work when you spam a champ and get to a point where you think you are so good at the champ that if you dont do well its their fault. I ran into this. When i started looking at my mistakes, i won, when i looked at otehrsr mistkes, i lost. If i lose ,i need to focus on my individual paly. Even if my teammates fed or afked or whatever. I should look at the situation and say" what can i do to help us win" or "How can i play this differently" This is in reason though. If im support and we are losing i should be like , ok im going to go top or mid. Now it is, hey we are going to focus on my lane and makes sure to win and keep us safe with wards or whatever. the other four people, are not going to respond to you alwysa and they will not think like you, they will not want to do the same things as you, which is fine. When a team comes to gether , then sometimes they will perform well, but most of the time you will be on your own.

For me to look for other thigns that might affect others it mighe be the best for me to look forward and convice someone to find the otehr thigns that might be lookking outfor nothing. becoming a better typist is something tht i strive for it is somethign taht i think i can do and become better at if something that watnts to come back at me and look , then they can do that no matter how they are, or what they will do.

Sometimes i just type for the fun of it. I say the same words over and over again , but they are nothing special. Just a way to practice typign somethigns and making thigns things work. The future is so unwritten that even in a couple of hours your world can shift from on the ground to in space. If you think about dying , then you lok at where you are now and what you are doinga and ask :is this what i want to be doing?" the answer most of the time is no.

Looking at my past weeks games and how i have always played, know what i shoyld be doing now. Even when i win a game , i dont feel good about it. I look at it and go wow, i playeed so bad. I missed alot of things, i might alot of mistakes and I didnt do as well as i should. Before i would of been like ... well i went 12-7 , man i rocked face taht game. I admit that i am not atht good. No one around is good. They have been playing so long tht they have stopped improving, and me i thought playing games with unconsiousness was okay.That i wiould some how just get better.......I was wrong , and i am no better then i was two months ago. I am a little better at zyra,but that is because i started looking on how i could improve playing her like i should. But my base mechanics and game knowledge and habits are all really bad.If i played a game against a silver player i would not win all the time like i should. My decisions are not the best and my last hitting and trading is soso. As a support i have lost confidence with certain champs. Thresh and some others. Whats intersting though, is while my c game is pretty bad, it isnt too bad. Even if we are losing so badly or i have made bad plays.I will still try to make something happen, i will hang in there to the end.Even if the feeling is not there for me.I will continue to play. The difference is that i am concentrating and looking at all my mistkaes and it gets me a little down.I was blind before and now I can see.

Interesting night will take them to ehnd of the world

It is my birthday!!! yay look at what is going on today, its going to be awesome! today/night and tmoorrow is going to be off the hook. gonna play some league late tonight then i will e at taht game tomorrow then out wiht m sis and bf sat night and its going tob e off the hook.

Looking at the members of hte union will take something then a long look in the mirror , it will look for soemthign that will take somethgn of a trouble some worrison lot they look for something that would take their minds off what just happened but at the sme time it took time and concentration for everyone to see what i saw. The room stayed still but my soul did not. Leaping towrd the fire place i knew that there was something there, something that wanted me to follow it to some unknown world behidn the flames. I wanted to follow it but the flames would burn me, or would they? I couldnt be for sure, it was the thign that kept me up at night , theose things that you wonder , shoiyld i have just gone for it, should i try it out even if it means death? of course i should use some reason to take into the situation.

How much can you see from just observing ?

When i have time I shoyld rewatch the world championship matches and see wat i can learn. I bet i can notice somethign that i did not see before.Since realizing that i am super bad hahah i have picked up alot of thigns that i did not before. And i notice really how bad i m,. Even with winning a gamee i do not have the satisfation that i wouldd ,becauese i know that i did not play that well and i have alot to improve.

I am striving for somethign that i am not so dedicated too. Playing league is something that I would love to do. All the time, running around the rift beating people and formultedign new thigns. granted I need a team. Look forward to teh times of winning and learnign from the times of losing

Stock Time!
#October 8th

Alright here we are on October 8th 2014


So right now we are going to take stock of me "Jonathan Jablonski" This will be a list of personal skills and how skilled I am at them. Then I will have goals and things taht I would like to do. After that I will make a comprhensive review of me.After all is said and done I will be able to look back and see how far i have come , be able to measure my progress instead standing still and lettign everything go by with out me know it. Let us get under way My stock : October 8th 2014 25,000 $ to my name 23 years old Drives a 2001 oldsmobile Lives with my parenst underweight minimal muscles Back hurst and gets head aches alot Job: Working at Chrysler as a pillar specialist or somethign (more like sharepoint designer) Girlfriend : Eve Lin Over all Health : Pretty good, could eat well and work out regularly now time for the skills. These do not have to be the best skills nor do they haev to be the worst Give skill then degree or what you think Peronsal Skill: Pretty decent , I can talk to people comfortably and relate to them. Polite in nature and can speak for my self. work Ethic: Very high , but attention to detail a little lacking sometimes. Likes to get things done with minial effort Attitude: Very relaxed, but sometiimes little things can send a torrent of emotion. Pretty level headed. Negative when situation down turns (working on it) Busienss skils: Has a good sense but lacks experience. Relating with people in business is sometiems tough ,because I like to see it from their point of view. Language: Knows a little bit of japanese ,not compentent at all. Programmming: Knows a little HTML,CSS and JS also a little of python. Not enough knowledge to do anything Writing ability: bad grammer and sometiems ideas are not preseneted well, but the detail and story is there Drawing: Out of practice and never got a foundation so skill is lacking. Getting things Done: Likes to put things off, does not always get things done unless it absolutly has to be done Musical Ability: Can sing a bit, used to play saxaphone and has a guitar. The ability is lacking and out of practice Acting/Entertainment: Never acted infront of anyone, but acting skills are sub-par. Facial expressiosn are minimal Speaking: Mumbles some tiems and anuceation is poor. Take deep breath , slow down and open your mouth when you speak Video Game Skill: Above average, but not to the point of being a pro. Lack of dedication and learning from misatkes Tennis: Out of Practice and out of shapre, same thign with games, never broke out of being above average. not thinking about how to get better during game. Just playing to play and getting mad because not going anywhere. Common theme with alot of things. Neogotiating skills: none. Likes to make everyone happy will not step on other ppls territory Emotional intelligence: High , only time it is messed up is during gaming or compitiion. Real life activity, business, emotions are in check and can take a beating. Typing ability: Could be better, i dont know what i type right now but it is not that good Socilization: Always feelsl like a drag, but peopel find me funny and fun to be around. Sometimes think i have to be around the right people.


So new format- Continueing this in write monkey for the time being, but i might switch back to brackets if I find this does not meet my need.I havent been able to sleep well for the last couple of nights. My dreams are plauaged by the others worlds from beyond. They seems so normal, but thene everythign just turns upside down. They are so life like as well.I feel that my mind is takign so much resources to render the almsot realistic unreality in my head that it is making so it doesnt get any rest. All i know is that i am not getting good sleep at all , and its affecting me during the day. I am so tired and my eyes hurt. Hopefully the dreams stop. It all started last week with a dream about standing on these stairs looking down toward a beach. Dark clouds were out in the distance and the waves were growing bigger, then all of a sudden the water turned black and started to produce massive waves. The crashes against he beach and raised all the way up to the stairs I was on. I took my phone and recorded a little bit of the waves.I remember trying to record/take a picture, but my camera was full, so I had to quickly delete some photos. A gaint wave rose up into the sky and a lighting flashed. In that moment I swear I could see a wrecked pirate ship in the wave about to crash down onto the beach. Its ghostly image was imprinted into me.The waves crashed harder and we ran to a abandoned naval bunker.there is was all water and blue mist filled with terror.

Then next is there is a version of my back yard that is a forest. The swing set is still there but it is extremely more fancy. There is a river that dips down behind it and the trees rise full into the air. Most of the time it is day time, but this tiem it was at night. I could see a plane fly above. It tips up and stalls out. I can clearly see how enourmas it is. It tries its best but soon crashes into the forest infront of me , flames bursting forth. A terror taht I could just sense with out seeing it approaches. I start to run and look back. A mannuiquen with white features, including white hair and a baseball cap emerges. I run and i know that if it sees me or catches me I will be eliminated.I ran, but I awoke moments later.


#November 10th
	Welcome back its time to start talking about league again and my dreams. Let us recap what has happened since I started my campaign of dominance in early August (I would say the start date of my dream was July 25th) So today is about 3 month from when I started this journey. I was silver when I started and I climbed all the way to Gold 2 in the end of September. Then at the end of spetember I fell all teh way to gold three from 100 lp Gold 2. The season ends to night and I will try to at least make it back to gold 3. My plan to get to challanger has moved to the end of december. So I have this month (november) and next month (december) to climb the ranks and get to where i need to be. In all honesty I thought that it would take me this long. What i did not expecet is that I would be so far behind. Now to many it might seem that i have wasted my last three months since I have not really gone far. Well that is very far from the truth. As a player I have grown alot. Even as a person I have grown. My understanding of progress and the outlook of the game is completely different from what it was before. Before I looked at my team and their mistakes. I looked at what other people were doing and tilted really hard when thingd did not go my way. I looked at the points , the elo as the indicator of how good I was. I only cared about gaining elo and not getting better. It didnt matter that i was bad as along as I kept climbing.When I fell really hard at the end of september. I had hti my head the night before and literlly played 2 days straight. With a numbing head ache both days and prob a concussion. It was not the best time to play and it was intersting that in 2 days what i had worked for in 2 months had vanished.I also witnessed my freind get boosted by someone. Which took them a week to go from gold 4 to plat 2. I was frustrated that he was ahead of me and I almost decieded to get boosted my self. In the end I didnt. I didnt play for the whole month of october in ranked. instead i palyed normals and played alot less. I focused on improving my last hitting and trading. My adc more like it. I praticed taht the most.I got better I learned alot from watching videos and reading. It taught me that I didnt know everything and I started looking at my mistakes. how can i improve this situation and what can I do better. I noticed yesterday that I played alright , but not as good as I could of done. Still alot of mistakes and I died way to much. Ive just started playing with a guy named bloodphenox he says hes a diamond adc.He is a nice guy and I plan on using him to learn alot about the game.Maybe he can be a future teamamte or something. I think I should start branching out and playing different roles or just switch to try and hard carrying games. I feel confident in my abilites in gold to do that.What I learned is that gold is just all about killing for some reason. Whole upper elo is about pushing and towers. All the things that ive been trying to do. It was funny hearing phoenix how gold logic is so bad and I was agreeing that I didtn know why people did not go for objectives. They just try and kill everyoen all the time. My strategy level gameplay is up to par , it is just my mechanic and split decision making skills that need to be improved. I just started playing ranked again and I shall continue for now on. I will be playing more now taht I have had this little break in october.
#November 11th
#November 12th

	Yeah man all my drawing supplies comes today for me and eve! I boughta new sketch book which i will use every single page of ! I swear to god~! And the rest of the supplies is for eve and I's anny. She is a great artist and I want her to start drawing again. Her lines are so pretty. I also got her the art of totoro for some inspiration. And since miyazaki just got his award it good to support him now that he will animate till death. haha nice gesture of kindness. Stick tothe fantasy stuff please man. I think realist fantasy could be his strong suit kind of like that movie with lum in it about the end of the world story/party. Really good anime movie, Ill get it tonight. It was animated in the 80's or some where around there. At least that what it looks like.

#November 13th Wednesday! 

	Welcome to the last day in the work week! Amazing times are ahead. It is time to work hard and reach the top during the preseason! At the moment I am Gold 3 with 18 pts on a 5 game winning streak. Time to extend that to 40 game winning streak and increase my rating to something in tense. Let us get to diamond in the off season . Then at the start of the new season climb with the pros in to challanger. That will be the deadline and start of the new time. I will out play everyone in my way. Lead better than anyone and just go for the goal. Stop the hands of time. This time is for real. This time it is for the future and not just for now. It is not just some hope, it is somethign tha will be achived something written in time and let out for everyone.It is time to improvea and learn. To look at how far i have come then look at how far i have to go. To reach the top. The number 1 spot. Carve my own legacy in esports. In the world. Focus and being open minded will get you far. determination will get you further. A dream filled with passion will get you to the goal. Be smart, be nice and humble, but be ruthless in your pursuit of what you want. The world wont give you thinks. It wont even remotly give you anythign if you dont want it. also how awesome is the quick jump feature on this program haah if you put a # in from of something it will make it a quick jump spot.Sweet huh? I thought so. Well here i am eating stir fry and working in the lunch room. Awesome isnt it. MY workflows are starting to work soooo nice!

Getting out of gold should not be too difficult now that i realize that i just need to become better at the things that make players great. The simple basic thigns. Csing , warding ,movement. Really pulling off complex moves is all about having the simple things mastered so when the time comes you just do the awesome move with out any worry that your other abilities will bring you down.

#November 18th

Oh man where to start. Well that 5 game winning streak? now on a 5 game losing streak ahaha what up though. Its alright. I realized that my rank is going to be largly determined by my placemnet matches. And this time really is all about improving ,which should be the main point always. The points? nah forget about them. I dont really care. the problem with measuring your self with some kind of score is that you soon lose focus on what you are actaully improving. Soon your just obsessed with gettign the points that it doesnt even matter if your doing well or not. As long as I get them points, im on the right track, right? No ! Elo or a score is just a way of giving you judge where you are and what you might be. Its really like your average of all your things combined. But thats it. It doest tell you what your good at, what your bad at. What you should be doing or should be doing. Even if you say "well your in gold so you prob are at this" Well i might be, but at the same time I might not be. I could be the best  csing person the world ,which most gold are okay with. Maybe i can cs and trade better than imp, but my decision making and mechincs on fighting in engages is bad. Elo wont tell me that. I have ot look at my self and say hey man, what were you doing at that moment? what could of you dont better to improve and win that situation. i know I know through out this whole kind of journel thing its been, look at your self, see what you can improve from situations. What could of been the most optimal solution for that time. what were you even thinking in that place, what could you have dont. Really life is all about overcoming your self. forget outside obstacles. The biggest obstacle is your self. If you can get around yourself. I am sure you can get through anyhting. Why is this you ask? Well if you really just sit and think about things. What have you done, or want to do that the only thing stopping you, was you!? if you really look. I mean really look. It mostly every single time. You said you were going to start eating right and excersing. that one weekend it snowed and you couldnt go to the gym. Whose fault was that ? the snow? no, it was yours. you could of ran in place for an hour , or did something else in doors. Or even put on some heavy clothes and run out side(dangerous do not attempt) Now this isnt to say that you should just put the blame on your self all the time and slip into the greatest depression mankind has ever seen. This is saying that most of us are always looking for something external to block our paths or improve the road for us, when really looking at ourselves is the key to success. It is extremely broad I know, but even if for say you are starting a business and you have no customers. Well is that the econmies doing or your own? Have you advertised have you dont this or that. Or lets take a spin at something else. you have been promoting like crazy, you talk to alot of people and they give you good feedback, but you are still not making any money. Well obvously its their fault for not buying the product and they just dont get it. Its that the times are not well for this kind of thing and my idea is pretty bad but people ar just telling me its good. Doubt slips in. Now ask your self. This doubt for your self. Who caused it? The people outside of you are being really encouraging and they seem interseted. The doubt comes you looking for the answer to you problem out side of things you cant control. You control how you interact with the people and your product. So no lets look at the problem. I talked to peopel they were interested. Great job done! no no no, what did you say? How did you do it? Here it is. Could you improve the way you "sold" your product? oh wait.…They were interseted.Yes but they did not buy. Why didnt they. You could easily go ask them. But look at all the things that you delivered. All the things that you controled and manipulated. Find things in that could be improved in those. This all coems back to league I promise. When you play league with a team or by your self. It is a team game, but you control one character. A single person, with a set amount of rules and things.  You control how you move, how you attack, what items you buy and where you ward. That is it. Outside of you everyone else does the same as your doing. They control those same aspects. You can INFLUENCE things, by saying, pinging , or making plays to inspire, but you never really control them. The only things you control is yourself. So when looking at improving, with this mindset. It is absolutly stupid to look at others mistakes, when you could look at your own. This somehow points back at real life. the only person you completely control is your self. You can influence things, but you control your self. Once you influence, there is a natural progeress that can take force, or you can push a little. Even when you think you are in control , when you take stock, you realize you are far outside, and that alot of the things going might be influenced by something you did, but the end results is the result of many other factors. So in the end of this long thing. If you want things to change, if you want to get to number 1 in league. You need to change your self. Thats it. Its alot harder then it sounds, but just remember to care about what you can control. And then influence when you can in a postive way. 


(Now lets take an example or something. Let us say you want to become the best. You decide that to get better faster you should move to cali to train with some people. this might be the best chance toget on a pro team since riot is out there. You move there and practice and you might or might not get on a team and join lcs)  What do you control ? First you control your financials to get there. You work to get the money or find a way to get it. Good

Second - You control making the effort to find a place to train and come up wiht a plan. Then you control influencing that plan to make sure it works or being flexible. Your attitude and decsion making it what you control in these situations. 

Third- You control how much practice, how you practice to an extent. You can as k for help and use influene to get it, but it is never in your control. 

Forth - You control if you stay on the team or try something else. Your decision to stay depending on what happens is up to you. This is extremely circumstancial, but the decision is always yours to make (even in contracts, you can leave, might be penatlistles) Like a job, you can get up and leave at any time, no one is forcing you to stay. 

(In all these situations, while you the only thing you control is your self, it is improtant to take into account what your actions will influence. Like a mad scientist. If you unleash a monster on the world. The monster is out of your control, but it was  what you had in conrtol (to release or not) that killed everyone in the end) 

Fith - Accept the contract and play. You have in your control to accept or deny the contact or neogotiate (not really haha)


It is extremely important to take in view that in almost every situation at any moment in your life that you control what you say, feel and act. These things influence the things around you. Saying you are in control of your destiney is contridictory to this view of the world, but it doesnt mean that the statement is wrong. If you do nothing, you have no influence on your life or others, but if you do soemthing, your influence branches and weaves into everything around you.  Carving your own destiney is a sum of your moves(how good or bad they are) and the natural movements of your influence. Here is where we see it. The more moves you make, the more influence you have, means the more chance you get to succeced and just more of about everything. The beautiful thing about the internet is that it gave people that never had the ability to influence the power too. Now a person taht never leaves their house can affect millions of people. By posting or making something. These people might have been able to the same thing by going out, but for reasons only known to themselves they did not. The internet also allowed people to influence others easily and more peopel then ever. Its like having a telephone to everyone in the world. Hey! look at what i am doing. boom people look at that, they might be inspire, they might not care, but for a moment you had influence over them.


This is a little bit of stoicism right here. control what you can which is your atitude and thoughts to bring happiness to you. Anything outside of that is no good. We'll like that to an extent. there are things that I want. Now I understand that the most important thing is self improvment. Improvment of my self leads to improvement of everything else. That is my way of life. But improving has everythign todo with you and nothing really to do with the outside. You can bring the outside to aid you in improving which has to done. Asking for help and all that stuff. My main goal with all this chatting is that what seperates some peopel from the other s is that they know how to control and get the results that they want. they are very confident and their inner dialogue encrourages and pushes them towards their goals. All this might get jumbled as i read about stoic Philosophy it came as treatment to deal with things out of your control. That is true, but i see it as also a paradigm shift. As humans we do spend alot of our time stressing over things that we cannot control or letting our emotions control us because our emotions are being influenced by other things that we cannot control. I mean thats kind of the basic understanding. We can communicate through emoitions so of course they have to be influenced through outside forces. But when we start to lose our selves in emotions, like anger ,sadness and other negative things because of outside forces. then it is not a good thing. When in league you allow your teammates actions to knock you off mental balance, that is a bad sign. When you are not making the most optimal decisions then you are on tilt. The perfect warrior would use their emotions to stir their body to perform when needed to on the field. Such as raising blood pressure and pumping adrenelene to increase reation time. If we look at sports , team moral is a huge thing. This is why we get excited and angery. To communicate what we feel with out teamates. Sometimes it can be detrimental and other times it can rally them to feel what you want. It is all about how you convey and influence them in that time. These result come from the skill level of the compitiion. It is obvious when two teams are on different levels. The team that is on a lower level uaslly doesnt have much control over their emotions or they slip. this causes a spiral and if the otehr team takes advantage its pretty much over.

Looking at team dynamic it is clear when a team is together and when they are not. It is also clear about players. Do they understand the role that they play. Do they understand that if their teammates fail at some aspects he might need to influence them in a way. If I had to give a example of this that might of happened. Let us say this. My team is losing or at least 3 of us is losing out of the 5. I can choose to just keep playing how I am and let them try and pick them selves up. Or I can say something if we can come out on top in late game. But I can also choose to influence them in another way. If I can pull off a play(plays inspire other plays) then the team moral can go up, I can literally give them a shot of confidence almost a reassurance in action. Making the play signals "Relax , calm down and lets do this" It should be a wake up call to them "Wow I am not playing well. what should I be doing different, what can i do to influence this game in OUR favor" This can be warding more, speaking up more there are alot of things can be done. It depened on the situation. Maybe this is saying , okay let us group and try something. It all depends on the situation. But the important thing is looking at how YOU the player can INFLUENCE the others on the rift to perform better. That this INFLUENCE can either be from words or from actions. IF you keep asking yourself how you can perform better, what can i improve that I control.And while in game ask the question how can I influecen this game to win, you will reach the top.

#December 2nd

Hey welcome back! Its been sort of a long time since november 18th that I wrote in this. That is so sad. Back in September i was writing almost every other day. Well let us talk about what has happened. So far I have been chilling while playing everyday. Not much other I have been doing. I have started to expand my knowledge of other lanes in the game, but at the moment bottom lan is still the most comfortable. I played jungle last night and didnt get rocked, so that is a good sign. My overall knowledge of tha gmae is not bad. I can identify things and know when to do certain thigns. I still need to improve my knowledge of the game and basic mechanics. I have been playing with lay for the last week or so. It has been fun and hes not bad. He does look at his mistakes and his adc is pretty decent. He need to commit to things and also trade better. He takes alot of unneeded damage. He is younger than me and stil in high school. Michael the other guy that he used to play with is pretty good. He knows the ins and outs of the champions. His memory I believe is good since it sounds like he does really well at school. Havinga good memory is the key to winning at school the way things are set up. I should learn more about the base stats of each champion and get to know the details of somethings that matter. Like movement speed and range. Those corelate with each other. 

So life is okay at the moment. Not the greatest not the worst. Really not much going on.Which is a shame. I thrive on events and crumble in boredom. I have been reading the art of learning which is a fantastic book. I need to start working out again. Like as in running and things like that that. I lift weights for a bit every other day , but I need to do more. The days are so short that I get kind of restless. Im losing track of time and im always tired. My future looks sort of bleak at the moment.

#December 4th 

	What........ UP! So played a 1v1 tourny last night. Lost 2 won 1 haha. I got wrecked so hard. The knowledge of one v one is so beyond  me at this point. The dueling is so much different than in a real game. It was hard and exciting. My heart started pounding extremely hard. I havent felt that in a long time. It felt good. I will keep entering these tournys when they come up. I need up my skills and this is a way to do it. It brings a new experience and also could win me some stuff if I get good enough. Since I have mained support and literly only played support for a year and a half. My knowledge and mechanic skills with champs good at dueling is quite low. Even with an adc like cait im not very good. Or well I dont get the 1v1. See what I am talking about is the 1v1 things. Like making everything to give you an advantage. The 1v1 match is no buys after initial buy so its all in from the moment you leave the base. While this does not mean much in a real match, Learning to adapt and also becoming mechanicaly skilled will earn you much in real games. I think that the 1v1 can improve skills that will help me in the real matches. Also getting over nervousness of playing people you dont know and the thrill of playing a 1v1. When looking at my play (here it is again) I have noticed that I tend to fall under pressure. Not badly, but I do not think as well. I start making bad decision just based on reaction and no proaction. Or I just keep doing the same thing over and over again. If hu


#December 9th
Ok let us look at the champions I want to focus on.

Top - Gnar and Rumble
Mid - Fizz and Lissandra
Jungle - lee sin and Vi (j4 aswell)
ADC - Corki and (maybe cait or lucian) 
Support - thresh and Nami

So I will focus on these champs. I have ot play another lane , I will play one of these champs. And I will learn them. So I wil have the knowledge and the skills for the lanes as well as a champ for each lane. Doing this will increase my skill level and compentency. Out of this list I would say that Nami and Corki are the best out of all these, specially nami. 

Rengar will be completely new to me. While gnar and maokai are new but not that much. Mid I have played lissandra nad like her alot. Fizz is pretty new to me. I have played him in mid and had moderate success. My mid problem has to do with confidence and warding. I know what I can kill someone , but i  do not have the confidence to kill them. I will get htem low, not end them. In fault I get ganked and die, either trading or losing.

I have played all positions, but I have only played adc adn support in the lst year or so. So sad I understand. I used to play mid all the time. the only position that I never really played for an exteneded period of time was top. I mid in season 2 and jungled in season 3. Season 4 I supported. The problem is that as I mained somethign the other positions have rapidly changed over the last few years and also the champion landscape has changed. I never really knew many champions back in the old days and today I could no play any og those people to the degree I can play some other champions. It is not completely helpless. It is essentially. What champion do you want to learn? I want to learn rengar. Okay, test him out in some normal games, get decent, spam him in rank. Play him till you think you have a pretty decent understanding of him. And decent understandig means having like a 60% win rate or something when you have the mastery. So obvs you are going to lose some games out of the bat , but as you get better and undsertand more your win ratio should go up. It go like this.

Rengar win ratio first week - probably around 45% - 50%
Rengar win ratio second week - around 55%- 60%

so in that second week you play a bunch of games and take the ratio. You do it more than once. You play 7 games and you win 4 out of 7. Good job, you play 2 games and win 2 games. Or you play 20 games and win 14 of them. Thats when you know you have it. Take your last 20 games and see if you hve one more than 12 of them with that champ. When that happens. You can move on. By doing this. You move to another champion and you know hwo to play rengar. You should play a couple of games a week with him to keep your skill set up to par. As you do this you wont need to play him as much. When you establish the links in your memory.Also do not keep track of your wins while playing. Just play to learn. Playing to get 13 out of 20 wins is not the goal of leanring the champ. The goal is to be so good at the champ that you can easily win 12 or more games out of 20. You should not be on the 19th game and be like......."OMG I need to win this game or I wont have this win ratio....." No you should be like " What do I still need to improve and what shall I look at" You should look at improving instead of the ratio or wins. I look at it this way. If you always just look at the metric and focus on the metric. When the metrici s max, it is lying to you.Others are approaching the max metric that you have, but they will go past it and your metric will fall. Self improvment is something that top performers do because when you reach the top, that is all that is left. On the way to the top, that is the key. Improve your self.Not looking at others to compare, only looking at others to learn.


Evia

#December 11th
Started playing rengar last night. Tough games, havent won yet. But I improed alot each game. Fed like crazy yesterday going like 1-9 . Last night though I didnt die in jungle, farmed jungle well and fast. Had succesful ganks and even went positive in a game. I made a mistake when starting to play renagar. One I didnt read any of his skills or abilites, or stats..…I didnt really look into his items or anything. I started watching a person taht plays him alot. Ill learn alot from him, but going foward I need to establish the most optimal way to learn a new champion. While I am progressign fast and I have no doubt htat I will be winning games by this weekend or even tonight. I will research more about hte character befoer I play tonight and forward. I missed alot of chances to kill peopel because I didnt know how his skills react. Here is my initial way I think learning a champion/ new or old optimally.

	1. Read and understand champions abilites. Doing this you can see the limits and maybe potential plays you can make. You can see what type of champion they are and how they will paly 	out.

	2. Read their base stats. This is important for knowing the limit of hte champion espcially if you are in a solo lane. You can then look and see what runes and masteries you can use to boost those base stats. 

	3. Look over item builds. Now that you know the stats,scaling and how the abilites work you can now brainstorm and look at the most optimal item builds for that champion.

	4. Watch someone that has mastered the champion. Watch what 	they are doing and how they build. Ask the question why they 	do the things they do. How do they utilize the strenghts and 	hide the weaknesses. 

	5. Last thing you can do is find a mentor that will teach you the ins and outs of the champion. This is same as step 4,but you have some one analyzing your mistakes and correcting them.

In fairness I would say 4-5 are interchangable. You can do one or the other or even both. I think getting a mentor would help you improve faster, just because they are looking at you stlye of play and they have the eyes to catch the mistakes. While if you look at your own play , you might not see those mistakes like they do.

If you follow these steps, each champion should be open to you. No matter if hte meta changes you can quickly adapt and learn a champion in under a week.

#12 December

	Oh yeah won a dominion game as rengar last night. Read his abilites. Now know what they kind of are. need to keep learning him. I will look at this base stats next and then watch clift play him. His style is hard to use. I would say that he is a hard jungler to use, just because you need to have really  good game senese when to go in as him. Hes not fast and pre lvl 6 his ganks are meh. He also doesnt have a free stun. It is more targeted, that is why you use bola after you leap/attack. Your right on top of them so the chances of missing are slim. On top of that I also played a petty good thresh game. The level difference in lane could be seen very easily. Even last night in our ranked game. Lane is never a problem.We lose? they stay, we kill the. I like lay for the reason taht he reacts fast. He does second guess him self somtime, but most of the time he is good to go. If he learned how to kite, he would be a very deadly adc.

#December 17th 

A question was asked on the summoners school reddit about how the person said that his reactions were the reason he was not getting further along.While I do think reaction timing is good and will help you become better to an extent. I think that it really comes down to how you look and think during the game. If you are predicting what the other person is doing than you take a step out of the mental process when the other person makes a move. Like ches, you think ahead and if the road changes, then you adapt and change with it. It is like playing chess at hyper speed. When they move tothe left or right then you have to instantly predict their moves and start to formulate the moves you will make. This makes it easier to react when the moves do happen. Why ? this has already happened before. When you play the game you kind of get this forsight into different champions, as you leanr how people play them and the differnet combo's. I know when j4 drops his flag he can shoot to it and knock people up. I also know that a combo is for him to ult right after hitting the flag. By know this I can predict his actions and take in account the enviroment even before it happens. Their team is on the way, I saw from a ward, ww is in the bottom jungle, I am a little out of position. He flags, then jumps to flag. Im ready with my flash to jump out of his circle if he ults. Where am I going to flash to? Well not bottom jg, ww will ult me , so probably straight back or upper jg, because that is where my team is. That whole mental process happens in a split second. Now he ults. I am ready for it. I dont have to "react" to it, it was calculated. The ultimate goal is to assess  a situation so fast and plan your moves at the same rate that it is natural. You want the thinking and reacting to be second nature. j4 flagging in and ult is second nature to me, but looking at the surroundings and taking in his dmg and everything else is not. J4 is not  the person i should even be paying attention to if he ults. It should be his team mates unless he is fed. I already know that when he ults he hits me and then he can pop his sheild or if he didnt use his flag and impale combo he can use either of those. Unless he is fed, I looking at the enviroment aroudn and planning. When you write it out, it sounds like it would take forever and you would be dead, but the actual time is mer milaseconds that his information is relayed and then acted on.
#December 18th

	Playing jungle lee sin is alot better than my rengar play. I won a game last night playing with camp and kytti. I did pretty well, I still do not have the competence to go intoa fight and know what I am doing. I still need to get the memory of the skills and their effects down. It was like my 2nd time playing him in actual games. I will pracice qing to them , then w to a ward and kicking backwards in a custom game tonight. Practicing in that enviroment will increase the copentcy of that skill faster than trying to do it in a regular game. I shall pratice in a custom then try it out in a normal game. If you practice thigns in an enviroment where there are no consequences, in the real enviroment you should perform fine. You can make mistakes and learn with out being punished for it. Build up confidence and memory of that skill then take it to the field in confidence that you can perform that. Same with last hitting. Get the last hitting down then start focusing on the other things. Custom games are great for learning how to do different tactics and practicing certain things. Being lazer focused and improving something, a single aspect will take less time than trying to do everything at once. If you chooose something ot be good at. Break it down , focus on it , get good at it, then move on.

#December 19th 

Last night practiced lee sin some more. Getting better, even counter jungling a little bit. Need to get the mechanics down. I practiced the q to ward then w to ward then kick. The hardest part of that is getting the kick off haha. But what the combo really is , you ward to get close, q them, then kick them, follow up wiht q for massive dmg. That is the real combo of it all.

#January 5th

This isnt to be successful, it is to be a better person and get better at everything. To not standing still and being the same from one day to the next.

#January 9th 

Welcome it is friday~ the best day of the week. It signals the end of work and the start of the weekend. Great day!I started listening to some new korean bands. B-block, nu est and GOT7. They are all very good and they lots of style. So now I have a ton of music to listen to haha. I would like to learn how to sing and dance to everybody by shiinee. That song is awesome. League is alright at the moment. It is kind of at a stand still. I am sitting at 64 pts in gold 2. I would like to get to plat this weekend. How manay times have I said that ? It not that hard. Its somewhat of a lot of games, but if you keep winningit goes by really fast. I mean I was like gold 4 with 1 pt 2 weeks ago. Look at me now. You just really cant let it get to you. You just have to keep playing and focus on your self. I started getting frustrated and blamign everyone else.It is like you need to center your self after wins and losses. winning can put you into a false sense that you are really good, while losing cna do the opposite. Look like you may never get out of your current sitaution. As long as you center your self. Reflect on the journey that you have traveled and then improve after that , there is no place to go but upward. And if you follow that method I think that there is no way that you would be able to no improve because you are always evaluating your self, and always looking at what you are ding which means that you are always looking for things to improve and you are constantly thinking of what you shwould be improving. This is kind of like a broken record, but i need to keeep telling my self this stuff till it is part of me. In my life i need to be improving every day and be able to understand my self and how to impove in a better way then before. If I am not moving forward, then i am standing still, which means I am not improving.**If you dont move today , you will never get anywhere tomorrow.** 

So it is the new year and I feel pretty good about things. I think that i can make some awesome things happen this year. I have been working out and getting in shape.

# January 13th

"It's all in your head" while it is a subjective statement. It is 100% true. But not in the way you would think. It is more of way to explain that everythign you look at, experience and live is through your eyes and in your head. The emotions and thoughts that you comprehend are all in your head.Stoic , everything is really just inside you. This is why if you can control your self , you control your destiney. Same thing with the statement "The world doesnt revolve aroud you" again same thing. It doesnt parse say, but at the same time , my world does revolve aroudn me , beacuse if i die , my world dies with it. The world doesnt die, everyoene elses world still lives, but mine goes away. Back to my thoughts on how increasing the mastery over your self and that they only thing you can do is infuence other people. To change their mind/sight is the only thing you can do . You cannot go into their mind and change it for them. You need to influence them in some way to get the result you want.If you know how to control your self, then influencing other people should not be so hard. You have control of your realm. Again , your fears and alot of things area ll in your head. Of course , a hungry tiger is somethign to fear, but at the same time , waht you would do if you did not fear the tiger. This is different then many would think. "well then you would get eaten because if you are not fearful of it , then you will do something dumb cause you think it cant kill you" Ah! no thats not even what it means. I look at a tiger, if I am fearful , my body kicks in and tells me to run, which prompts tiger to run. I'm dead. I remove the fear out of me, and I look at the tiger, I notice that its eyes are closed. Instead of running I just back away slowly. Problem averded(). Fear doesnt tell me that the tiger is going to kill me, or a fast moving train/car will run into me and kill me. Emotion doesnt tell me that. Knowledge and knowing the human bodies limitation does. Most negative emotions prove to be nothing more than distractions to the normal flow of your natural self.


#January 16th 

Hello, it has been a simple day when we look toward the sun and never see what we are looking for, but when we do not know what we are going towards then we never knwo what we are doing. Cheers man. 

Well look it here I have tea and a new keyboard. It is awesome. Feels good and looks good, easier to type as well. Low impact keys and the sound is not that loud. So when i am typing up a novel it is not so loud to those around me ahhaha . sometimes I think people are listening and are like what is that boy typeing…he is typing so much oh man, that cannot be for work. Well they would be half right, it isnt for work but it can infuence work,soooo its all fair game. those run on sentences though. I do not much worry for things that do not concern me to muhc, but i would like to see things come into veiw more often then nought. 

n realistic fasion you could easily make 1000 dollars a month and adventure around the world
with your computer for a year or two. With a sustainable online business, you can work from anywhere
If 1000 dollars covers you apartment and basic living conditons getting a part time job anywhere would 
be ideal and would just be for spending money. 

So think of it this way. You make 1000 dollars a month from an online business. 

Apartment is 600 (from online sights) Doesnt need to be big, its just for relax and sleep
Internet is going to be around 30 dollars or so.
Phone bill will probably be 80 or around that. 

If your rent covers your electic and water. All you have left is energy. Whihc will come maybe 50 or 
something- and that would be high.

So you have 600 + 30 + 80 +50 for a whole month. This is basic living without food. Food might be 100 - 
200 depending on how much you want to spend. 

760 dollars a month is what it takes to live. This is with out any other expensive pretty much. 

IF you look at it like that you could live in your own place not doing anything ever for around 980 
a month. 

If you would like to travel or do anything, you would need to make more then that. For say you are
living in japan or something. You take a part time job that makes you like 500 or something a month. 
That 500 can be used to do/buy what ever you want. Or you could work on your website to accumulate more sales
and make more a month than you are now.

That text up above was written in notepad than transfered over to this program.

This weekend will be fun, going out with some people.But i really need to practice. I didnt play for two days, seesm like so long. Really I needed a break. I just need to grind it out you know. It will be okay. The season starts pretty soon. So I want to be ranked as high as possible by then so when I do my placement matches im close to where I left off. Or even higher haha. But we will see how it goes. I will need to play better if I want to climb so hard. I need to start picking my champs stratgely. I could prob just climb as zyra or j4 bot support. Super easy. There are many champs that can help you climb. Like just play some snowball champs and win super hard. Then make sure you team has no room to fail. I think that is one of the main things people do not get when climbing. When you win , it means you also have to win the other lanse for your team mates if they are not doing well. A simple lane swap can make a worlds difference when some one is getting coutnered or something. OR when you win your lane , you go help another lane out. Warding is great. Ward for your teammates. It will make the stay alive, beacuse you can warn them before anything happens. Also taking enemy jungle or just messing around in enemy jungle is really strong. You can literly sweep , camp forest and win the game. I dont know hwy more solo q dont just bush gank. Its so easy and it wins games so hard. People are so stupid, they run around , get caught and rage. Seriously , bush ganks are what win games. Deny vison and get into position to win. Vision is so key. Making it so your opponents cant see what is going on will make them error prone and will make it so you ahve all the informaiton on the rift. The more information you have the better decisions you can make.

#January  21st 

980 a month to live in japan not doing anything. Haveing light food covered and an apartment ready to go. A whole year would be 11,760. 

A whole year could be spent in Japan for that much money, with out working. 

So I have been playing some league lately. I hae noticed this. One I dont really rage, I make snarky remarks. Two I do not think all the time while playing. I am not constantly looking for things to improve, this is prob because i do not have a goal in mind when i play. Besides winning that is. Three, if I start losing and alot and think about the points , I play worse and rage. This would be the point where I would look back and be dissapoitned with my self. I shouldnt call other people out for their mistakes. I make my own mistakes, I dont need to concentrate on thiers.

It is the start of season 5 today. It is the start of my career. It is the beginning of my journey. 

I watched faker yesterday for about an hour. Man the things you can leanr from watching him is just incredible. He knows his champions so well and he knows how to play. One thing that I noticed is his rengage. SO fight breaks out. He does damage, then backs up a little ,even if his team is losing , then waits for the right time. Watching for the skills and the cool downs. When its time, he goes back in. He makes it easy. 

I am going to start watching some of my videos that I record. I look at two things. How I sound/look and my play. The play first. I noticed when im in the game , I do not talk as clear as I do when out of the game. My speech is mumbled, because I do not open my mouth completely when I go to talk. Unless I am yelling or calling something out , It is hard to understand me. This is something that I would like to fix, because it would lead to alot better situations in other aspects of my life.

I should stream more, when anyone is watching me , my heart races, I dont know what to say. I am guessing that it would get better overtime, but it scares me. I think that I would be good at entertaining people. It might be the future for me. I want to compete, but I also want to help and make my self known for seomthing.


#January 22nd 

Well I have played 4 out of 10 placements matches and have lost 3 of them. Two games were just throw aways. The team we played was alot better than us. It was fun to play them to a sense, but no one really understood that they were just getting massivly outplayed in almost every regard. It is okay though. I went from silver 2 to gold 1 in about a month last year, and im better than I was. If I get placed low, I will just have to grind/carry all the way back up. Its alright. It looks like plat 1 is the highest you can be placed anyway. Also I have never played at the beginning of the season before. I would always start in around june or august. which leaves me like 2 months haha. Then after november I would nt play anymore. SO if you think about it, I would only play about 3 months a year. Alot in those three months. But not nearly enough. My goal is to be more concious when I play. I need to get in the habit of asking myself, What am i going to focus on this game. And after, how did I do? Staying focues


#January 23rd

Another time ago I wondered what my life would be like. Instead I should of been asking what I wanted my life ot be. When I looked at my self and saw what I would become. I didnt like it. I still dont, but I have a clearer goal now. It has always been there. I just didnt see it. League might not last for ever, but esports is going to be the next thing. It will grow and become something of a sport in the upcoming time. There is no doubt. It was what I was ment to do. It took me while to see it. A now that I see, it is time to go for it. I realized it last year around august. My pulse quickens when i see it. I imagine my self competeing. Winning. The fans, interviews. I see it all now. I will have it. I lack the go ahead, the putting my self out there. I dont mind, but at the same time I do.


# January 28th 

Today I have around 35,000 dollars in my bank account. Next week I will have 36,000, by the end of febuaray I should have 37,000 in savings and 38 total. If I put 2,000 away every month this year. I will end up having 59,000 by the end of this year. Is that alot? no of course not. But is it a start. A base that I could have. Yes it is. Should I start looking into investing my money a little bit. Yes I should. I have built up a nest so taht I can attempt some things in my life. That I need to move forward into some other things.Today has been werid, I have been getting good sleep, and my dad asked told me there was more to life than video games. Hey! no duh there is more to life than video games. There is more to life then anything. I dont need you to tell me there is more to life when I think i understand that better than you. It set off a nerve because he does this. Oh you never talk to me or what ever guilt trip. Its like no one wants to talk to you when everytime you do that. Its annoying and I understand the game he is playing. Think about me, Is i do that someitmes, but i always joke it off in the end. But for him , he just lays it on and it gets to the point where you are like..…dude cmon , thats enough. I really dont want to talk to you now. There is alot of things going on, but nothing i really want to talk about . I have a lot of work to do and I need to train even harder. The redditors and other people say that it is risky, many peopel would call me stupid. I have built up some money. I m credible. I have held a job at a major corporation. I am nice, smart and capable of doing alot of things. Thsi is something I want to move forward with , I want to do. There is nothing raelly stopping me or stepping in my way. If I get down the habit of improving and other things. I will take off not , only in league but in everythign else. Playing the games is jsut part of this whole plan. I am not just planning on being a "hey i play games and thats it" im going to brand the hell out of me and make some serious money well having a great time. I am going to win.

# January 29th

Crowdsource - find someone that has the expertise that has the skills to make your dream to happen. Get acces and build what you want.  League man. It is a good time, but super hard haha. It is easy to play, but hard to come out on time. Last night I played one game and lost. It was kind of sad, because we were winning most of the game, but then their team played to their strenghts,but we did not and ended up losing. I didnt give good suggestions and also mis played some things late game. It was more direction then actual play. Because when I knew the signs and knew what was going to happen if we didnt do things. Like taking mid then not getting another inhib. Their team was designed to split.


#February 5th

Hello - I have been found and weighed before the end of the night. It has been awhile. Almost 6 days, a whole week! Well it just goes to show you that sometimes you just forget to do anything and it all runs away from you. Being focused is pretty hard for me at the moment. I am constitently tired in the morning and I wish I could just get some good sleep. It is like when my head hits the pillow, its time to wake up. Or i wake up in the middle of the night. Let us talk about league for a a couple of mins. Its been going alright. So the system has been live for 2 weeks haha , seems longer than that. Jan 22 was the first day. I guess almost 3. 3 weeks in and I am gold 2 with 42 points. Dam son ..... you werent even gold till august last season. YOU DAMN RIGHT. This year im ending in diamond at least. It is my goal. I had a break throuhg where now it is like I can get to top gold, no problem. But once their I have hit another road block which  I must get past. This road block I think is the biggest. It is getting into that top 10% The next one wont be untill diamond 3 I believe.Once I get to plat 1 I will be playing diamond people, but I doubt they will be much better then plat 1. That will be determined once I get there. Cannot worry about it now. 

Right now, I believe it is mostly just mental. People throw games really hard. Instead of looking for oppurtunities to make a play or win, I am to mad at what my teammates say. People are really demoralized right now. They lose one trade and they give up.I keep my cool until half way. When people are just complaining for ever.I have been typing to much to them, wasting my energy. Arguing. When watch a pro play. When he dies, he ignores the rest of the game. He looks around the map, but when some one makes a mistake, he doesnt just focus in on their mistakes. He might comment a bit, but then its back to what he was doing. And it is always in the down time of his play. Walking to base, buying items, walking back into lane. Or when he is dead.( for a breif few seconds) It is like you look at the situation and ask your self, how can i play this the best I can. Then try to do it. My mental side , the toughness is soo poor. I complain sooo much its insane.When I win a game. I notice , I am in control. Not mad or anything, I am paying attention, playing smart, calm and collective to a point. IT is all positive energy. They made mistake, doesnt matter, what can I do. I can always do something.The mechanics are important. But I can gain those ery easy. I do not see a problem with that. In reality it has never been about that in anything. I am smart enough to gain the skill and apply it. It has been the mental side of the competition that has ruined me. I have good form , but I have no mental edge. I can obviously learn new champs and get better at things. No question. But if my mental edge is not there. It doesnt even matter.


#February 11th Wednesday

Well hello there again. It is the middle of February. Fun stuff. League is going alright. Been losing alot ,but its not that bad. Still learning alot and losing rekindles me and makes me start thinkign of what I can be doing differently. I think I am 34-37 ? I think or something. Once I get even my points will start going up again. It is a funny time. I need to start getting my name out there as soon as possible and starting making a reputation. Why? because i want to get noticed. Also I would like to get better as well.

#February 12th Thursday 

Havent been writing as of lately, just wondering what I am doing. Working most of the time, then the other time isjust staring at my screen. Not writing. That should change though. Idle time is death. It makes your mind wander and you are no longer being productive. Bad things eh. I should start working on my typeing again. It wouldnt be that hard. Take like a half hour and just practice typeing in the correct manner. Increase my typing speed. Which I think would help my writing out a bit. It is not taht I do not type fast enough, its more that sometimes I feel that way. Like at the moment it is more of the mistakes that make my tpying sloppy and I can los ideas when i  am tpying and have to go back and fix my mistakes. This is becuase my form is incorrect and my fingers do not stay where hthey are supposed too. Learding to mistypes and all that kind of stuff. Intersting that I cna type a little bit faster then I used to be able too. Still not good enough though.


#February 20th Friday

Been sick all week. Been at home working most of the time.


#March 1st Monday
 
Last week went by pretty fast. This might go by just as fast. Time just kind of goes, if your not concious about it, then you will end up not doing anything with it. It will be to bad. Things wont work out cause the time is not on your side. But really , when is time on your side. It is always ticking down runing out of time. You are constantly running towards death everyday that you breathe. So in a matter of time , it will never be on your side. So make it part of you and use it well. Or perish with the thought that you had mastered something that you hae no control over.

#March 2nd Tuesday

It is snowing again. But its okay, I like the look of it. Its pretty calming and nice. I am going to miss pax east this year. It is this weekend and I thought it was at some other time. Shame on me man, really wanted to go. 
To the sky, flying high , take me to the moon. Day or night ,we dont have to say a word. Because you make feel like im intoxicated.

#March 6th Friday

When I looked for something, there was nothing wrong with them , but only time would tell you that there is something wrong with anything.


#March 12th Thursday

Another week has gone by and nothing has been enetered into this thing in a while. My ideas are dripping out in the cosomos with nothing to stop them. Ending in the disbelief is something that I could not wonder what I am doing for soemthing that is like nothing that I have ever seen before. Looking forawrd to finding out what I can do with what I have and nothing else at the disposal of my very being. Does it look so wonderful to fall with nothinig left?

just ramblings. Future is what I make of it. I ahve been having some weird things towards my father. I have been just very annoyed at him lately. Prob because he is alot of pressure on me. Even wiht my job the pressure looms a little. It is my problem though. I can simple just relieve the pressure my self. Which is what I need to do.

#March 13th Friday

	Welcome back my freind. Sometimes things just get in the way and you lose what you really want to do. Lately I have adopted a calm atitude except when lay messes up haha. I dont know what it is. Like I want him to do well, but he just keeps making hte same mistakes. He hasnt been playing lately so I should expect anything out of him. For me I am going to hit ranked pretty hard for now on. One it needs to be done, but I needed to get my mindset going before I embarked on this journey. Starting if off wrong wouldnt be the best thing. Last night I won one game and lost the other because of disconnect. The second one it seemed pretty dire, but i knew we could pull it off. Early deaths and thigns that happen dont put me on tilt and do not affect my play as much. I just let them slide and focus on my self. What can I be doing or what did I do incorrectly in the last instance.  I also noticed I am taking more calculated chanes and  beeing better postiioned. I stay back, if I cannot aa then I do not. I am making smart trades and staying out of range of instant death moments. In team fights I have been better positioned as well. Since I play more of a mage champs I stay in the back just beyond tank line. I know if an engage happeens, I am pretty safe. Playing more thresh or blitz, I would be near the front line. When the fight breaks out I still need to observe more things than I do. Picking up moreinformation makes it esaier for me to make my next move , even if it is a in a split second. 

I am pretty sure I ahvent won a ranked game as zyra yet. Which is too bad, I think the last night game could of been my first, I had a 60% win ratio on her last season. I am not offering hte util that I should be when i play her at the moment. It is getting better, getting roots and doing lots of poke damage. Seems like early mid game are easy , but people fall apart at the late game if they ahve no direction. To improve at an alarming rate, I am not sure the process. I know the process to improving. Calm head, lookat at everythings as learning and learn from everythign that happens. Study and be prepared and also think, imagine your self sussceeding. But to make this whole process go faster is something that I do not know how to do. Maybe it is just more pracitce time and then hitting your strides. Keeping humble in those tiems and makes sure that you are alawys trying to improve your game. When most practice 4 nights, you practice 7 nights. You go at it with intensity that has never been seen. The intesity and the reserve that comes with it. To look back and know that yuou are confident you can defeat anyone in your way. This whole process is made hard because of outside factors and things. That is why you can think of ranked as prepareing for LCS. Your rank doesnt matter that much, if you improve and able to take down people, that is what matters. Making hte decisiosn to move forward and win. No matter what is happening. Taking what is happening and make it into a winning situation. Even if you are the worst player in the world , but you can do that you will find success and win. 


End of March. I will be Platinum. Doesnt matter how many games it takes. I will get there.It is the 13th today. I am gold 3 with 81 points. Look up, correct mistakes, dont be rattled and win. Review games or mistakes, capture mistakes and elimate them. Keep moving. What ever it is , keep playing. Once you stop, like I stopped playing ranked, it is hard to start back up again.


#March 20th Friday
Hello their. Everytime is seems that I have not talked to you in some time. Oh lamet the thoughts. Alas we are back though to give a some sort of update. Well it looks like unless I get plat this weekeend, I will not acheive what I stated. Well that is because I will not be able to play next week for a whole week. Unless I play on Eve's computer. Which is not that bad. I mean I am starting to play ranked again, so in retrospect I should be able to achive goals here pretty soon. It is time to start grinding , but do it in a manner that puts me on the rails to improvement faster than other people. This means activly tracking mistakes and then reflecting on said mistakes at a later time. Learning than applying. You know, the simple cycle of learning. I am also going to leanr how to use Ruby the progmramming language. It seems easy enough so far, I am sure it will get more complex as it goes on. Doesn't matter, I will ocnquer it. Everyime I look at league it seems that I  am standing still. This feeling comes from my rank not moving and me feeling that I am not getting better. I should build up my straming while improving at the same time. It would probably benefit me greatly. Since people watch I want to provide them wiht what I do wrong so thehy can fix what aever they are doing incorrectly as well. Show them the method of leanrning. The method of improving. I want them to follow me on my journy to the LCS and my journy to becomeing the best. All this doubt and things makes me think that I am not doing enough, maybe I am not doing enough. Maybe that is why I feel this way and that I thought I would be alot further along by now. Its  been around 7 months. started in August. It is now the end of March. I feel if I reach a year and I have nothing to show for it. It will be dissapionting. There is still alot of time and still alot ot do. So much that I need to leanr and so much that I need to experience. 

If I read back , I look back and wish I was furthur along. Looking back and Seeing that I took around 2 month of ranked play. Now its been almost 3 months since I really didnt play this month. Meaning htat I only played half ranked that I could of. Which means that I have missed major oppurtunities. Does not mean that threre arent anmore, just means that I need to keep my eye out and keep going. Do not get discouraged now. I havent done anyhting yet. At momments like this all I want to do is play league. All I want to do is improve ,test what I am thinking and try my hat in the ring.


#March 23rd Tuesday


#March 27th Friday 

So yeah I think I am getting sick, sore throat is creepying up on me and that is no good. Drinking lots of tea tonight and also going to take a sore throat medicine. Gonna play alot of leauge this week. Non stop, lose or win. Doesnt matter. Gonna play, gonna learn. GONNA LEARN AND BE AMAZING. Watching alot of ls videos this week, since I could not play. I thought he was a huge jerk but terms out he is just really blunt haha. He kinda a cool guy. His breakdown of the game is what I should be doing and if you watch other people no one really tells you what is going on. Its when Ive been telling hui to do or at least think about, but he just breaks down everything, especially positioning. You are almost playing your opponent instead of your self. Which makes sense. You take in the sitaution based on what your oppentent is doing then react or act in that situation. Gotta get home, my car got rocked today ..... sooooo sad. Getting it fixed atm, but I will get something new, it will cost me a bunhc of money a month ,but that is okay. It has to be done and once I get it then I will pay it off and then I will have a nice car :D. Then gotta make a bunch of money.


To account for the amount of time I have been playing, it hasnt been alot. When I play,  I do not play the most optimal times, and do not play the whole time. Weekends are wasted because I think I have alot of time. So I only play a few games a day instead of packing them in. Playing will make me better but only if I acknowledge what I am doing and actively getting better each game. If I do that the road to improvement is under my feet. Looking good eh, cannot wait to get home. Alot of lol to play and also alot of things to test out on my comp such as airpal, looks freaking sweet.Alrightsee you then


#March 31st Tuesday

Let us talk. So we can find out what everythign is about once anf for all. Then we will look towards teh future and sing with rejoice that we knew what we were going to do. What will it look like when we reach the end of the road? 


This weekend will be fun. Going to DC, gonna see everything ! and be awesome. Gonna drive for about 4 hours , eve will drive for 4 hours, we will get there. Take a nap , then hit the town. I hear it is supposed to rain the whole time we are there which is to bad, but what can you do.  They just dont do things justice. You look out with eager eyes just to discover that nothing is left but your own sentiment. Looking for someone and something that you could never find. But the hope and the determination will get you there eventually and let you experience what you always wanted too. Take a leap and go far, if you never jump off , you will never fly.  


I need to get my base understanding of the game before I climb. I have picked karma as my champion to win as. I will practice and master her. The basic understanding and mechanics. I will rise to plat with her and maybe even to diamond. I will play her for at least 78 games. Then decide my gaps and reasses my self on her. I will either work to improve those gaps or move over to a new champion to become compitble in. Again this goes back to the sesnse that "master the game" isnt about mastering the game , but mastering the champion. With mastering the champion you have to master an aspect of the game that is transferable to other champions. Such as with karma or other support. You look at warding, pressue, and trading. These things will change slightly depending on what champ  you play , but good habits in these will carry over to all champs , while mechincs on abilites will not transfer and the knowledge of the potential and reach of that champion will only transfer when facing them. Which unles they are in the meta the chances are slim. Take league as the one foot infront of hte other approrach. Instead of trying to run (learn all the champions) you crawl (learn one champion). As you master the one champion you get an idea of the basics (abilites , movement to  a sort, the game itself) then when you master that champion (leanring to walk) you start to move to other champions (increasing speed of steps) till you are running full sprint (master all champions and being faker) 

That approach is the best. It works. It is how everything is learned. Steps and work.  What I strive for is not just progress, but optimal progerss. This means that the dips in my performance before the climb is minimal. For instance (insert graph with many stairs while it climbs to 50 it then drops to 25 and then climbs  to 75 again and again going up by 25 each time.) This graph shows how progress is made to a degree. When you learn a new skill or work on something that is weaker you instanly drop 25 on the graph. Really this isnt the problem, the problem is that it takes the same amount of time to get the 25 back as when you originaly got it. Two things. Either minimize the fall of your progress by preparing before and doing upfront work or decrease the time it takes to make up the 25 that you lost. so then each time it falls you get better quicker. So for instance you are learning how to play counter strike. By playing the basic game with one gun (the m4) you learn some what of hte baiscs. How to move, switch weapons, crouch, what buttons to press the maps (somewhat) and that your aim is based on recoil. So now you have gain a basic understanding of the game from just playing. Now those basics. Learn them. No. I mean really learn them. Switching your guns when the clip is in will reduce reload time, strife left and right hten hitting two keys will reset recoil, bunny hopping all these really basic things. Of course you pick the m4. Learn it. The spray pattern, the feeling of it and then how many shots per hitbox does it take. All these things add up to at the end when you have mastered the m4 you have control of it .Going into a match you know how to weild it. Other things, not so much, but you havea  foundation. you know the steps to mastery.

Repeat and improve the process

The secret is above.

#April 2nd Thursday 

I have officially picked up soraka as my main. Let's go.

#April 7th Wednesday

I have officially decided not to play soraka as my main. Let's go.

I can soraka, but I I should only use her in later staegs. I need a champoin that can carry to a degree and not rely so much on the team. (not saying 1v5) but someone that is just defending a person, because then my whole exsistence is made for that one person, and guess what they will probably be bad.


So at the end of the day, there needs to be something that I can lean on that I am  a master of. A champ that I can win with most of the time. Like hearing rushes story, he was like well..…Lee sin and j4 were so strong that I could just carry with them, so thats all I played. I just need to pick a champion. Like leona or sona or someone that makes plays and also is super solid. Can act on their own to some degreee. Again I have moved away from my main champs more like I just havent played any other role. Mid was fizz and liss, jungle was vi and lee, top was ......liss and ????? rumble.... wow im bad. Okay so then adc will be jinx and graves. Support will be ............I dont know. I want it to be nami and some one else. But its not about who will be the main champs its about who am I going to play to diamond. I will pick one champ and go. If I dont get that champ I default to another, but it will most likely be that champ only. 

So here we go.

Sona
Annie
Blitzcrank
Nami
Leona
Lux (maybe)
Zyra (love her have trouble winning late game)
Lulu
Janna(dude..…IDK she just is so good at the disengage and things) 

##Start with sona
	I like her , good ult, good utility. Squish but has heal and sustain. She is very basic to play, positioning needs to be good and build needs to be optimized. Ult is very clutch and needs to be used well. She does decent dmg as well. 

##Annie
	Does losts of dmg has aoe or targeted stun. Has built in sheild that can be spammed

She has no escape, squishy, if they build mr or have lots of health she becomes less effective. Tank meta makes her hard and cannot peel for any teamates.

##Blitzcrank
Good initiate, the god hand. With vision can win games very easy. Can get tanky and has a silence adde on to him. 

Got nerfed kinda hard with the speed decrease and if other team get tanky, makes him less effective. 
##Nami

Good cc and harrassment power. Has good synergy with alot of champs and can improve damage alot. Her ult can be good disengage. 

High skill cap, lots of variables. No click and cc. Squishy and mana hungry.

##Leona

Tanky, kills lane ez. Synergy is good cause of procs. 

All or nothing, Ult is on low cd, but only ranged skill that does put her in compromising position. If team is losing, or do not know how to play wit her, really hard to win.

##Lux

High dmg and with skill shot cc with two. Has sheild that can be beast.

Needs gold, all skill shot based and her procs are only for her. No escape and squish

##Zyra 

High dmg, good cc skillsot and slow.

Squishy, slow, needs mana and gold.

##Janna

Good disengage, sheild is beast and gives dmg nad wins trades. fast. 

Squishy, can feel unimpactful. Misleading. Timing is an issue. 


So I have been playing nothing but janna and sona. I am going to continue to do this in ranked. They are so strong and there is no reason to play anyone at the moment. I mean I could play other champs, but Im just going to focus on two, climb and then improve on the others after  I climb. My goal is to improve as a player, But to get to that point it isnt even about tha champs at this moment. It is about the base of the game. When I get up to that level. To diamond, master and all that jazz. Then I can focus on the champions ( as in play like everything)  LS says peopel can get to where they are jsut by pure mechanics. Yes they could , such as coswap playing Yi all the time. His mechanics on yi are so good that he could do what ever he wanted and still win. But put him on another role or champ and he would fall probably hard.

#April 15th Wednesday 

Hello there. Got a new car. Fun stuff. Wont be able ot play leageu for two days. So sad, but this weekend.No stopping me. All weekend. Like last sunday. I just played like 10-12 games. Lost won , lost won , but I ended up having more pts at the end of the day and! it was fun and I learned how to use janna better then before.


#April 23rd Thursday

	So what up.....Playing alot lately. Havent played ranked since monday, but its okay. In Gold 2 with like 6 points or something. Not that it matters much. The improvment to the game or my rank will come rapidly. My game has improved, but not substantially. What I have been doing is working as much. Well I mean I took alot of breaks and I havent been practicing full heartedly. The drive is not missing, but it breaks here and there. Last night though. It was like, should I go to bed and just relax the rest of the night or should I play a game? I chose to play, and I played decently well. I played jinx and won. Our lanes won , but I had tons of gold and did better than I thought. One thing that I am trying to do is predict and outplay oppenents by taking advenatges of their mistakes. Such as caitlyn using her q. I know she is immoble for a sec. Might as well dodge and do dmg to her. Someother things is like using skills ot coutner other skills. Timing has improved and so has my mind set. Losing a lane does put me on tilt so much. I play safe and I know what can happen if I go in and do other things. Losing some farm is not that big of a deal. Losing farm and giving kills is.

That mind set is hard to grasp, a player might feel out of control when he or she is getting zoned. This could because they dont have proper wave management. I have been playing with some cool people and some strong contenders. One of them is predator. He is good. He knows the game well.I can learn alot from him, even pinja I can learn alot from.


Breathe deep, then out. Think positive motivatiing thought.


#April 29th Wednesday

I have started writing in Journey and blog like ghost made out of hte language go. I want to start making guides on self imrovement in gaming.I think a simple blog will be able to acomplish this very easily. The main two games I want to foucs on are CSGO and LOL. Easy right. Sort of I need to complie my notes in the correct way.


#May 14th Thursday

It has been awhile again. I have wrote some articles in Journey, but somethings are substantial. I havent written about playing in a bit. Its been a little rought these last couple of weeks. I havnet been winning alot and my progess is pretty bad. When you have been trying to play for 8 months and havent gotten anywhere it takes a toll on you.

#May 15th Friday

Build a world and let your characters play around in it. Do not build the characters and have them play with the world. It will feel artificial and make it seem less realistic. Lotr, he stated he is just watching and record ing a world.


#May 20th Wednesday

#May 21st Thursday

Wow going to work on my typing skills. they are really bad. Every day I will work on getting better at typing , using the correct fingers to presh the correct keys and just increasing my over all accuracy and speed.


#May 22nd Friday

Welcome to another time with me . try ing to improve my typing and it is gong pretty well. My hand kind a hurt because using fingers that dont usually get used and lost of mistakes ensure. but soon it will be nice and my typing speed will be very fast and fluid. 
cannot wait gotta practice harder.

#June 26th Friday

Been....A......Long...........Time! What up. Things have been going on , went to wyoming to see my cousin get married, but a supre laptop and started streaming for HUYA (a chinese site) Today I am sitting at Gold 1 74 pts. Pretty exciting huh? Improvement has been slow? well i dont really know. I havent been keeping htat much track and I ahvent been playing ranked in about a month. So sad. I have been playing alot, just not really paying attention. I did play a top tryn game which went great, but that is the only new thus far.

Winning is about making hte plays at the correct point in time. If you can do that , you can win any game. I think the next champ that I will learn is alistar. He has always been good, but at the moment he is in meta. I dont really believe that I my self personally is restricted to a meta. To make that statment more clearer. If the meta changes, I dont think I would have a problem chaning with it. My champ pool is pretty diverse.

#July 15th 

Again, some time has been passed since the last typing in this document! Current ranking.............PLAT 5 with 43 points BABY! Made it! i will admit though , when I got into plat I lost like 6 games in a row. I have won two in a row last night , and will try and continue this trend. To win and get to diamond by the end of the season. Then through out the winter I will try and get into masters. I shall further expand my streaming empire this year haha. 

Streaming on Huya has been alot of fun , got a scissor stand for my microphone so it doesnt take up the space on my desk and also it doesnt pick up my keyboard as much (still does, but now my voice is the center focus on not the keys) 


Ive been having some problems with yy the last couple of days which has inhibited my Streaming ability. I had to stream using the stand alone software instead of going through the chat/room client. Interesting set up though. Things are taking some shape? well its coming along, I have alot things to do and a lot of things ahead of me to do. It will be interesting and fun. It is time to get out of my comfort zone and grow as a person. Streaming has already done that to an extent, but I want to get good at it so my followers and veiwers like watching my stream and me. That is a big part of it. I dont need to be liked, but I want my viewers to have a good time and just relax.

#July 24th 

Hey now , still in plat 5 80 pts. Streaming still, having fun and I think I am making money. yeah yeah.


#August 13th 2015


Got demoted last night , so sad..…but it comes with the grind I guess. I bought dampeners for my keyboard here so it isnt as loud. I notice the different typig at the moment, still not the queitest** but its better then it was, also the keys need to be pressed a litte harder for multiple dampers, such as the backspace or the enter key. Not a problem though. So I really want tostart writing again . that is one reason I got the dampeners , so that I can type with out the huge noise and type alot with out it being so noticable. We shall see how it works,so then we can start writing a little bit more than we have. The travel time has been reduced as well. Interesting things have happened. Now we will se what will happen at the end.


#September 3rd 2015

Havent talk in whilel. Around 50 pts in plat 5. Need to improve the basics


#September 8th 2015 

Hey theres......once again ists been a bit of time, just got back from chicago and bought mgs:V. The game is super impressive and also it runs so well. MGO will be even better then I thought .And i bought it for PC which is something that I would never think of saying about a metal gear game. I havent played league in a while. I havent lost interest, but Im not very integrated with the community or have any good friends that play it. So it can get boring after a while.

#September 14th 2015 

Welcome to the new place. Well it isnt very new, but it might seem that way. its been about a week. Need one more game to get into plat 4. I am going to keep rising this time, intead of getting rolled and drop all the way down to zero points like last time.

Having some werid feelings about my future these last couple of days. Got some camera equipment to start doing videos today. Will test it out and get better at editing videos and get some content out there. Producing content is a good thing. Either its bad or what ever. It just needs to improve. I have bought some things to try and get good quality off the bat. It would bE better. Ross tran really inspired me. His channel is so beast. Super high quality. It is seriously refreshing to see it that way. Sky started doing more high quality stuff. But its just like a btter camera. Not the production of it. Somestimes its high scale , but I guess I ahev only seen a couple of his recent videos. I dont want to be famous just because of my videos, I want to put good input and let it be part of my sales funnel for what ever I do, whether it is streamer , coach , player or what it is. I am about to be 24 and I have been figting myself and oter about what I should be striving for. I made it a goal a year ago to become a pro player. I have learned alot of things in the last year, and I am closer, but I still havent hit that momentum that I thought I would get. I didnt rise as fast as I wanted too. I can still do it, but the time that it takes is rather scary. I need to get to the top in the time I ahve , which is difficult, Losing two games or 4 is like a whole weeke wasted. While if I played 100 Games a week, its not that bad. I should be working , but all these thoughts about my future creep up and tell me what I am doing is not what I sHOuld be doing, I ask back whAt should I be doing , there is no answer. I would like not to waste my time. I would like to be the best, compete , create a a legacy. We shall see .

#September 23rd  Wednesday



It gets closer as time goes on. the time of day taht will never surfice for what you say, the things that will not look back and then reach for the starts to only love and find out what there is to do , but do not let them run out of time. Take the from what is worth and then let me know if it is time to be the best or the worst in the sate that it is in or will I be set to fail from where  I begin or shall i rise to the top where no one can even touch the mountain that has been wiating for me to reach and prevail.


# November 6th Friday

Welcome to the annual time of the year where reflection is a part of the world and will know no bounds for hwat is right , there issmeting to be said about something that does no go for things , look at what is going on when the perfect time is heanding out the thhinks that willtake me to the next level , mastery is one of those things that will place upoin me the life that \i would like, mastery of my self and other aspects of the life that I want wil look for some goals that will never be afariad to think about those things, but do not foget about that has been done before us otey will let e know what is gong ot bahppapne e.


All this stuff is just so mesed up. Lets just get on with out lives shall we. Alright so it looks like tnothing is goin to happen with out the consnses of the gorup , so let us just get it done with. 

It has been a while again. once again it has been a while. soooo nothing has happened I have been in plat 5 for 5 months. yup , play dropped off a little, beene streaming alot, not playing alot of ranked. Really dropped off at the end of this season. Barely played during the wC and just well , just became kind a bad. Well I wouldnt say bad, just didnt improve like I should or watned too.
